Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska2-254
Organization of county agricultural society; petition.

Subject to sections 2-267 to 2-273, the registered voters of a county may petition the county board to organize a county agricultural society in a county where a county agricultural society has not already been organized. The petition shall be signed by registered voters of the county equal in number to fifteen percent of the whole number of registered voters of the county who cast votes for Governor at the statewide general election next preceding the submission of the petition to the county board. The petition shall be in the form required by section 32-628 and the Secretary of State shall provide such forms upon request.

Laws 1997, LB 469, § 5.